src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON TUVSÁN !incoming from justtuvsán
 +Sg+Nom:%>     K ;          
 +Sg+Gen:%>a    K ; 
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>a    NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;          
!+Sg+Attr:%>   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !sg gen go to numeralcmp
 +Sg+Acc:%>av   K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij   K ;    
 +Sg+Ine:%>in   K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:%>is   K ;            
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn  K ;            
    +Ess:%>in   K ;                  
 +Pl+Nom:%>a    K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij   K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt  K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn  K ;                
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs  K ;                 
 +Pl+Com:%>ij   K ;                 

LEXICON WG-LÅK-TUVSÁN
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;         
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>a NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !changed from sg+attr to sg+gen
 +Sg+Acc:%>av K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;    
 +Sg+Ine:%>in K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:%>is K ;            
! +Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;            
! +Ess:%>in K ;                  

LEXICON WG-TUVSÁN
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;         
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; !changed from sg+attr to sg+gen
 +Sg+Acc:%>av K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;    
 +Sg+Ine:%>in K ;           

! compounding and derivations

LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! arabic as first part, 
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-  NAMÁKCont ;            ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»# SASJCont ; !6-jahkásaš
+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#jahkásasj+A:-»»#jahkásadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#jahkásasj+A+Err/Orth:-»»#jahkasadtj ÅLLAGASJ ; !
: RHyph ; ! 3-


LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part 
        NAMÁK   ; ! tuvsánajienak, lågegielak, etc. 
        SASJ    ;
 +Cmp#:# NUM2ADJ ;
 : RHyph ; ! 3-

LEXICON SASJ ! Second compounds. From numerals
+Cmp#: SASJCont ;

 
LEXICON NUM2ADJ
tjuohte+Num:#»tjuohtásadtj DER-SASJ ;
tjuohte+Num:#»tjuodag9 DER-AGAdj ; !from OK
tjuohte+Num:#»tjuoedeg9 DER-AGAdj ; !from Kintel

! NounSecond ;	! golmmačiegahas	
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;	   
! !tuvsán#geardásaš 
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ; 


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON VUOSTASJ      				
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;          
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;         
 +Sg+Acc:%>av K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:%>in K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:%>is K ;            
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;            
 +Ess:%>in K ;                  
 +Pl+Nom:%>a K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:%>ij K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijda K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:%>ijn K ;                
 +Pl+Ela:%>ijs K ;                 
 +Pl+Com:%>ij K ;                 
 +Attr:%> K ;					
 +Cmp/SgNom: R ;

LEXICON TUVSÁNAT				
 +Sg+Nom:t%> K ;          
 +Sg+Gen:tta%> K ;         
 +Sg+Acc:tta%>v K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:dda%>j K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:tta%>n K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:tta%>s K ;            
 +Sg+Com:tta%>jn K ;            
 +Ess:dda%>n K ;                  
 +Pl+Nom:tta%> K ;                 
 +Pl+Gen:tta%>j K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:tta%>jt K ;              
 +Pl+Ill:tta%>jda K ;              
 +Pl+Ine:tta%>jn K ;                
 +Pl+Ela:tta%>js K ;                 
 +Pl+Com:tta%>j K ;                 
 +Attr:t%> K ;					
 
! Collection numbers
! ---------------

LEXICON GUOVTES           
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%> K ;          
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>v K ;                 
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>j K ;                     
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>n K ;                 
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>s K ;                 
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>jn K ;                    
    +Ess+Sem/Hum:á%>n K ;                    
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:á%> K ;                  
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>j K ;                 
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>jt K ;                
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>jda K ;                   
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>jn K ;                        
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>js K ;                        
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>j K ;                         
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Hum:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%> PxV ;     
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>s PxCi ;      
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>n PxC ;      
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>st PxC ;     
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>jn PxC ;      
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:á%>j PxC ;      
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:á%>jd PxC ;     
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:á%>jdis PxC ;        
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:á%>jn PxC ;     
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:á%>jst PxC ;        
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:á%>j PxC ;      


LEXICON VIDÁS           
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>a K ;          
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>av K ;                 
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ij K ;                     
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in K ;                 
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>is K ;                 
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn K ;                    
    +Ess+Sem/Hum:%>in K ;                    
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:%>a K ;                  
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij K ;                 
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijt K ;                
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijda K ;                   
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn K ;                        
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijs K ;                        
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij K ;                         
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Hum:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%> PxC ;     
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>as PxCs ;      
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in PxCs ;      
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ist PxCs ;     
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn PxCs;      
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij PxCs ;      
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijd PxCs ;     
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijdas PxC ;        
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn PxCs ;     
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijst PxCs ;        
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij PxCs ;      


LEXICON VIDÁSLÅGENAN                        
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>a#lågenan%> K ;      
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>av#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>in#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>is#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ijn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Par+Sem/Hum:%>it#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Hum:%>a#lågenan%> K ;                      
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;             
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Hum:%>ijt#lågenan%> K ;                
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Hum:%>ijda#lågenan%> K ;               
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Hum:%>ijn#lågenan%> K ;                    
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Hum:%>ijs#lågenan%> K ;                        
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Hum:%>ij#lågenan%> K ;                     
 
LEXICON TJUODAGIS                       
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Ani:%> K ;                          
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Ani:sa%>j K ;                                       
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Ani:á%> K ;                          
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Ani:á%>v K ;                         
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Ani:á%>n K ;                         
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Ani:á%>s K ;                                     
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Ani:á%> K ;                                  
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Ani:á%>j K ;                                         
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Ani:á%>jt K ;                            
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Ani:á%>jda K ;                       
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Ani:á%>jn K ;                                    
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Ani:á%>js K ;                                
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Ani:á%>j K ;                                     
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Ani:á%>jn K ;                            
 +Sg+Nom+Sem/Ani:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Ill+Sem/Ani:sa%>s PxCi ;      
 +Sg+Gen+Sem/Ani:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Acc+Sem/Ani:á%> PxV ;        
 +Sg+Ine+Sem/Ani:á%>n PxC ;       
 +Sg+Ela+Sem/Ani:á%>st PxC ;      
 +Pl+Nom+Sem/Ani:á%> PxNomPlV ;       
 +Pl+Gen+Sem/Ani:á%>j PxC ;       
 +Pl+Acc+Sem/Ani:á%>jd PxC ;      
 +Pl+Ill+Sem/Ani:á%>jdis PxCs ;       
 +Pl+Ine+Sem/Ani:á%>jn PxC ;      
 +Pl+Ela+Sem/Ani:á%>jst PxC ;     
 +Pl+Com+Sem/Ani:á%>j PxC ;       
 +Sg+Com+Sem/Ani:á%>jn PxC ;        

LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:        # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:        # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:        # ;
 +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine:%:dinie # ;



LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
     +Sg+Nom+Use/NG: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Ela+Attr: MARKDOT ;


LEXICON dateyearcase
 dateyearcase_nullsuff ;
 dateyearcase_fullsuff ;
